Washington statutes.
RCW 19.188.010

Finding.

The legislature finds that, to the extent that electronic media, including television, motion pictures, video games, and entertainment uses of virtual reality are conducive to increased violent behaviors, especially in children, the state has a duty to protect the public health and safety.

Many parents, educators, and others are concerned about protecting children and youth from the negative influences of the media, and want more information about media content and more control over media contact with their children.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 801.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.